src/Korektor/hyph_sr-Latn.dic
.po2d3o2k1n
.po2d3of
.po2d3oč
.po2d3oš
.po2d3ra2v1n
.po2d3ra2v1n2j
.po2d3ra2z3d
.po2d3rad
.po2d3raz2r
.po2d3raz2u1
.po2d3ram
.po2d3ran
.po2d3ran2j
.po2d3ras
.po2d3rez
.po2d3rep
.po2d3res
.po2d3rik
.po2d3rit
.po2d3rov
.po2d3rož
.po2d3ron
.po2d3ru2č1n
.po2d3rub
.po2d3ruk
.po2d3ruč2a1
.po2d3ruč2i1
.po2d3upl2a1
.po2d3us2m
.po2d3us2n
.po2s3t2l
.po2st3e2g1z
.po2st3ind2u1
.po2st3lim
.po2st3o2n1k
.po2st3oper
.po2t1k
.po3g2n
.po3d2nev
.po3d4jen
.po3d4ječ
.po3m2n
.po3m2n2j
.po3r2v
.po3r2đ
.po3t2kav
.po3t2kam
.po3t2kat
.po3t2kah
.pod2a1
.pod2v
.pod2i1
.pod2l
.pod2l2j
.pod2r
.pod2u1
.podv2a1
.podv2e1
.podv2i1
.podv2u1
.podvar2i1
.podvl2a1
.podvr2a1
.podvr2i1
.podj2e1
.podl2a1
.podl2e1
.podl2i1
.podl2u1
.podlak2a1
.podlij2e1
.podl2j2u1
.podn2e1
.podr2a1
.podr2e1
.podr2i1
.podr2u1
.podup2l
.pos2t
.post2e1
.post2i1
.posti2n1d
.postl2i1
.postop2e1
.potk2a1
.pr2e1
.pr2e1duvj2e1
.pr2e2d3odr2e1
.pr2e2d3os2e1
.pr2e2d3osj2e1
.pr2e3d4voj2e1
.pr2o1
.pr2o1tiv2o1
.pre2d1m
.pre2d3v
.pre2d3i1sp2i1
.pre2d3ig2r
.pre2d3id
.pre2d3iz2b
.pre2d3ist2o1
.pre2d3ist2r
.pre2d3j
.pre2d3ob2j
.pre2d3okus
.pre2d3os2v
.pre2d3rad
.pre2d3rat
.pre2d3rač
.pre2d3ruč
.pre2d3ubeđ
.pre2d3ubijeđ
.pre2d3ubjeđ
.pre2d3uver
.pre2d3uvjer
.pre2d3uvjet
.pre2d3ugov
.pre2d3udar
.pre2d3upis
.pre2d3usl2o1
.pre2t1k
.pre3d4vaj
.pre3d4var
.pre3d4ves2t
.pre3d4voj2a1
.pre3d4voj2i1
.pre3d4vor
.pre3d4vos
.pre3d4jen
.pre3t2kam
.pre3t2kat
.pre3t2kah
.pred2i1
.pred2o1
.pred2r
.pred2u1
.pred3m2n
.pred3m2n2j
.predv2a1
.predv2e1
.predv2o1
.predis2p
.predis2t
.predj2e1
.predod2r
.predok2u1
.predos2j
.predr2a1
.predr2u1
.predub2e1
.predub2i1
.predub2j
.predubij2e1
.predubj2e1
.preduv2e1
.preduv2j
.predug2o1
.predud2a1
.predup2i1
.predus2l
.pretk2a1
.pro2t1k
.pro3g2n
.pro3t2k2a1
.pro3t2k2i1
.prot2i1
.proti2v3a2k1c
.proti2v3ot2r
.proti2v3of
.proti2v3r
.proti2v3ud
.proti2v3us
.protiv2a1
.protiv2u1
.r2a1
.r2a1z2a1
.r2a1z2a3t2k2a1
.r2a1zb2a1
.r2a1zvr2a1
.r2a1zl2a1
.r2a1zor2a1
.r2a1sk2a1
.r2a1skl2a1
.r2a1sp2a1
.r2a1st2a1
.r2a2z3ob2a1
.r2a2z3ud2a1
.r2a3z4vij2a1
.r2a3s4klop2a1
.r2a3s4pet2a1
.ra2ž3đ
.ra2z2d1n
.ra2z3anal
.ra2z3b
.ra2z3v
.ra2z3g
.ra2z3g2n
.ra2z3d
.ra2z3e1
.ra2z3i1
.ra2z3j
.ra2z3l
.ra2z3l2j
.ra2z3m
.ra2z3m2r
.ra2z3n
.ra2z3n2j
.ra2z3o2r1t
.ra2z3ob2l
.ra2z3ob2r
.ra2z3od
.ra2z3or2u1
.ra2z3orav
.ra2z3orat
.ra2z3ot
.ra2z3r
.ra2z3u2d1b
.ra2z3uv2e1
.ra2z3ud2i1
.ra2z3uz2d
.ra2z3uz2e1
.ra2z3uz2i1
.ra2z3ular
.ra2z3um2r
.ra2s3k
.ra2s3p
.ra2s3t
.ra2s3c
.ra2š3ć
.ra2š3č
.ra3z4ba3u1
.ra3z4bad
.ra3z4ban
.ra3z4bar
.ra3z4bašur
.ra3z4boj
.ra3z4bor
.ra3z4v2e1d2e1
.ra3z4v2r1t
.ra3z4v2r1ć
.ra3z4val
.ra3z4ves2t
.ra3z4vig2o1
.ra3z4vij2e1
.ra3z4vij2u1
.ra3z4vit
.ra3z4vić
.ra3z4voj
.ra3z4von
.ra3z4vrat
.ra3z4vrać
.ra3z4g2r1t
.ra3z4gađ
.ra3z4ev
.ra3z4id
.ra3z4iđ
.ra3z4iz
.ra3z4ij
.ra3z4il
.ra3z4in
.ra3z4ir
.ra3z4it
.ra3z4ić
.ra3z4lag
.ra3z4laz
.ra3z4lik
.ra3z4lič
.ra3z4log
.ra3z4lož
.ra3z4loz
.ra3z4met
.ra3z4meć
.ra3z4mrs2k
.ra3z4nat
.ra3z4red
.ra3z4rok
.ra3z4roč
.ra3s4ka2n1d
.ra3s4kak
.ra3s4kin
.ra3s4klad
.ra3s4klan2j
.ra3s4klap
.ra3s4klon
.ra3s4klop2i1
.ra3s4klop2l2j
.ra3s4koš
.ra3s4krop
.ra3s4p1n
.ra3s4p2e1t2e1
.ra3s4pav
.ra3s4paj
.ra3s4pet2i1
.ra3s4pet2o1
.ra3s4pik2u1
.ra3s4pin2j
.ra3s4plin
.ra3s4plin2j
.ra3s4polož
.ra3s4pon
.ra3s4por
.ra3s4prav
.ra3s4prem
.ra3s4r1d
.ra3s4r1đ
.ra3s4r2e1
.ra3s4t2r1t
.ra3s4tav
.ra3s4taj
.ra3s4tan
.ra3s4tat
.ra3s4ten2j
.ra3s4til
.ra3s4tin2j
.ra3s4tir
.ra3s4tis
.ra3s4tit
.ra3s4toj
.ra3s4trel
.ra3s4tret
.ra3s4troj
.ra3s4tup
.ra3s4tur
.ra3s4tuć
.ra3š4ćen2j
.ra3š4čić
.ra4s5tu2r1č
.raz2o1
.raz2u1
.raz3d2n2i1
.raza2t1k
.raza3g2n
.razan2a1
.razb2o1
.razbaš2u1
.razv2a1
.razv2e1
.razv2i1
.razv2o1
.razv2r
.razg2a1
.razg2r
.razl2i1
.razl2o1
.razm2e1
.razm2r1s
.razn2a1
.razr2e1
.razr2o1
.razul2a1
.ras2r
.rask2i1
.rask2l
.rask2o1
.rask2r
.raskl2o1
.raskr2o1
.rasp2e1
.rasp2i1
.rasp2l
.rasp2o1
.rasp2r
.raspl2i1
.raspol2o1
.raspr2a1
.raspr2e1
.rast2e1
.rast2i1
.rast2o1
.rast2r
.rast2u1
.rastr2e1
.rastr2o1
.rašć2e1
.rašč2i1
.s2u1
.s2u1pe2r3u1
.su2b3a1
.su2b3i2n1v
.su2b3ju2n1k
.su2b3l
.su2b3o2k1s
.su2b3o2r1d
.su2b3rep
.su2b3rog
.su3b4aš
.sub2i1
.sub2j
.sub2o1
.sub2r
.subj2u1
.subr2e1
.subr2o1
.sup2e1
.sup2e2r3e1
.supe2r3a1
.supe2r3i1
.supe2r3o1
.supe3r4ior
.superi3o1
.t2r
.tr2a1
.tr2a1n2s3a1
.tra2n1s
.tran2s3v
.tran2s3e1
.tran2s3k
.tran2s3l
.tran2s3m
.tran2s3n
.tran2s3n2j
.tran2s3o1
.tran2s3p
.tran2s3t
.tran2s3u1
.tran2s3c
.tran3s4ep
.tran3s4kr2i1
.tran3s4ud
.tran3s4um
.transk2r
.u2g1m
.u2z3b
.u2z3v
.u2z3g
.u2z3d
.u2z3i1
.u2z3ig2r
.u2z3inat
.u2z3isk2r
.u2z3j
.u2z3l
.u2z3l2j
.u2z3m
.u2z3n
.u2z3n2j
.u2z3o1h2o1
.u2z3obes2t
.u2z3obijes2t
.u2z3orav
.u2z3orat
.u2z3r
.u2z3ugar
.u2s3k
.u2s3p
.u2s3t2a1r2a1
.u2s3t2r1g
.u2s3t2r1k
.u2s3t2r1n
.u2s3t2r1p
.u2s3t2r1ć
.u2s3t2r1č
.u2s3talas
.u2s3tv2r1d
.u2s3tv2r1đ
.u2s3teg
.u2s3ter
.u2s3teć
.u2s3tov
.u2s3traj
.u2s3tral
.u2s3treb
.u2s3trep
.u2s3tres
.u2s3tum
.u2s3tur
.u2s3tuć
.u2s3c
.u2š3ć
.u2š3č
.u3g2m2i1
.u3g2n
.u3z4bor
.u3z4van
.u3z4vat
.u3z4viž
.u3z4vij2a1
.u3z4vij2e1
.u3z4vij2o1
.u3z4voj
.u3z4dic
.u3z4lan
.u3z4lat
.u3z4lim
.u3z4lit
.u3z4lić
.u3z4lic
.u3z4lov
.u3z4ludob
.u3z4n2e1v2e1
.u3z4n2e1vj2e1
.u3z4nak
.u3z4nač
.u3z4nic
.u3z4nič
.u3z4noj
.u3z4r1n
.u3z4r1n2j
.u3z4r2o1k2o1
.u3z4rev
.u3z4ret
.u3z4rijev
.u3z4rijet
.u3z4rok2a1
.u3z4roč
.u3z4ruj
.u3s4k2o1
.u3s4kak
.u3s4klad
.u3s4klađ
.u3s4kup
.u3s4pav
.u3s4pal2o1
.u3s4pe2n1t
.u3s4pev
.u3s4pel
.u3s4pem
.u3s4pet
.u3s4peh
.u3s4peš
.u3s4pij2a1
.u3s4pij2e1
.u3s4pijuš
.u3s4pikuš
.u3s4pjev
.u3s4pjel
.u3s4pjem
.u3s4pjet
.u3s4pjeh
.u3s4pješ
.u3s4pon
.u3s4por2a1
.u3s4por2i1
.u3s4poren
.u3s4poren2j
.u3s4poreč
.u3s4posob
.u3s4prem2a1
.u3s4prem2i1
.u3s4r1d
.u3s4r1đ
.u3s4r1ž
.u3s4r1k
.u3s4r1l2j
.u3s4r1n
.u3s4r1p
.u3s4r1t
.u3s4r2a1
.u3s4r2e1
.u3s4rijed
.u4s5k2o1k2o1
.u4s5kov
.u4s5kol2e1
.u4s5kom
.u4s5kop2a1
.u4s5kor2a1
.u4s5kos2i1
.u4s5kot2r
.u4s5koš
.uz2a1
.uz2a3t2k2a1
.uz2o1
.uz2u1
.uza2t1k
.uzb2o1
.uzv2a1
.uzv2i1
.uzv2o1
.uzd2i1
.uzin2a1
.uzis2k
.uzl2a1
.uzl2i1
.uzl2o1
.uzl2u1
.uzlud2o1
.uzn2a1
.uzn2e1
.uzn2i1
.uzn2o1
.uznev2j
.uzob2e1
.uzob2i1
.uzobij2e1
.uzor2a1
.uzr2e1
.uzr2i1
.uzr2o1
.uzr2u1
.uzrij2e1
.uzug2a1
.us2r
.us2t
.usk2a1
.usk2l
.usk2u1
.uskl2a1
.usp2a1
.usp2e1
.usp2i1
.usp2j
.usp2o1
.usp2r
.uspij2u1
.uspik2u1
.uspj2e1
.uspor2e1
.uspos2o1
.uspr2e1
.usr2i1
.usrij2e1
.ust2a1
.ust2v
.ust2e1
.ust2o1
.ust2r
.ustal2a1
.ustv2r
.ustr2a1
.ustr2e1


.2a1b2a1
.2a1bre3a1
.2a1n2a1
.2a1n2a1b2a1
.2a1n2a1k2a1
.2a2b3l2a1
.2a2n2a1gr2a1
.2a2n2a1kl2a1
.2a2n2a1pl2a1
.2a2n2a1st2a1
.2a2n2a1fil2a1
.2a2n3a1lf2a1
.2i1z4ose3i1
.2i1zb2i1
.2i1zv2i1
.2i1zv2i3i1
.2i1zod2i1
.2i1zos2i1
.2i1zoh2i1
.2i1zra3i1
.2i1nte2r3i1
.2i1nte3r4es2i1
.2i1sk2i1
.2i1skr2i1
.2i1sl2i1
.2i1spl2i1
.2i1st2i1
.2i1str2i1
.2i2z3ved2i1
.2i2z3i1
.2i3z4val2i1
.2i3z4val2j2i1
.2i3z4i1m2i1
.2i3z4rač2i1
.2i3s4prav2i1
.2i3s4tav2i1
.2i3s4tor2i1
.2o1be2z3o1
.2o1br2o1
.2o1d2o1
.2o1dr2o1
.2o2d3o1n2o1
.2o3b4raz2o1
.2o3d4ran2o1
.2u1st2u1
.2u3z4vij2u1
.2u3z4rok2u1
.2u4s5kol2u1


# TODO

2sc2r
2šc2r
3b2den2j
3b2det
3b2djen2j
3b2djet
3g2degod.
3g2dekad
3g2dekak
3g2djegod.
3g2djekad
3g2djekak
3g2miz
3g2mil
3g2mil2j
3g2naj
3g2nev
3g2než2đ
3g2nez2d
3g2nijež2đ
3g2nijez2d
3g2noz
3g2noj
3g2nos
3g2n2jav
3g2n2jev
3g2n2jes
3g2n2jet
3g2n2ječ
3g2n2ji3o1
3g2n2jil
3g2n2jil2j
3g2n2jit
3g2n2jur
3k2než
3k2nez
3k2n2jig
3k2n2již
3m2naž
3m2nog
3m2nož
3p2sik
3p2sič
3p2sov
3p2suj
3r2đ2a1
3r2j2e1
3s2fer
3t2mas2t
3t2mu3o1
3t2mul
3t2mul2j
3t2mur
3h2tev
3h2tel
3h2ten2j
3h2tet2i1
3h2tjev
3h2tjel
3h2tjen2j
3h2tjet2i1
3c2mak
3c2mač
3c2miz
3c2mok
3č2lan
3č2lan2j
4r3je.
4r3jem
bd2e1
bd2j
bdj2e1
gd2e1
gd2j
gdeg2o1
gdek2a1
gdj2e1
gdjeg2o1
gdjek2a1
gm2i1
gn2a1
gn2e1
gn2i1
gn2o1
gnij2e1
gn2j2a1
gn2j2e1
gn2j2i1
gn2j2u1
kn2e1
kn2j2i1
mn2a1
mn2o1
n2e1
n2i1
ne2g1d
ne3g2de.
ne3g2dje.
negd2e1
negd2j
negdj2e1
ni2g1d
ni3g2de.
ni3g2dje.
nigd2e1
nigd2j
nigdj2e1
ps2i1
ps2o1
ps2u1
sf2e1
tm2a1
tm2u1
ht2e1
ht2j
htj2e1
cm2a1
cm2i1
cm2o1
čl2a1

# lj, nj, dž izuzeci
.a2n3jon
.an2j
.anj2o1
.i2n3jek
.in2j
.inj2e1
.i2n3jur
.inj2u1
.i2n3jus2t
.o2d3žal
.od2ž
.odž2a1
.o2d3žal2j
.o2d3ž2i1
.o2d3ž2v
.o2d3ž2e1
.pre2d3ž2i1
.pred2ž
.pr2e2d3ž2e1
.na2d3žd2r
.nad2ž
.na2dž2d
.na2d3ž2n2j
.na2dž2n
.na2d3ž2e1
.na2d3žan2j
.nadž2a1
.na2d3žir
.nadž2i1
.na2d3živ
.na2d3žup
.nadž2u1
